Arkansas, session 2025, HB1422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Only Citizens Vote
Act".

SECTION 2. Under the authority permitted under Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13(b)(1)(C),
concerning verification of voter registration, is amended to read as follows:
*ZRC051*
03-10-2025 11:19:45 ZRC051

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1422
(C) Documents and identification cards that comply with
the requirements of subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section include without
limitation:
(i) A driver's license, except as provided by
Arkansas Code § 27-16-801(b)(2)(C);
(ii) A photo identification card, except as provided
by Arkansas Code § 27-16-805(e)(2);
(iii) A concealed handgun carry license;
(iv) A United States passport;
(v) An employee badge or identification document
issued by an accredited postsecondary educational institution in the State of
Arkansas;
(vi)(iv) A United States military identification
document; and
(vii) A public assistance identification card if the
card shows a photograph of the person to whom the document or identification
card was issued; and
(viii)(v) A voter verification card under Arkansas
Code § 7-5-324.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-1-101(40)(C)(i)—(viii), concerning the
documents and identification cards that meet the definition of "verification
of voter registration" used in relation to elections, is amended to read as
follows:
(i) A driver's license, except as provided under §
27-16-801(b)(2)(C);
(ii) A photo identification card, except as provided
under § 27-16-805(e)(2);
(iii) A concealed handgun carry license;
(iv) A United States passport;
(v) An employee badge or identification document
issued by an accredited postsecondary educational institution in the State of
Arkansas;
(vi)(iv) A United States Armed Forces identification
document; and
(vii) A public assistance identification card if the
03-10-2025 11:19:45 ZRC051

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1422
card shows a photograph of the person to whom the document or identification
card was issued; and
(viii)(v) A voter verification card under § 7-5-324;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-4-109(e)(2)(D), concerning the
qualifications of state and county election commissioners, election
officials, poll workers, and certified election monitors, is amended to read
as follows:
(D)(i) The State Board of Election Commissioners shall
promulgate rules under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201
et seq., concerning the training requirements, materials, and examination of
essential skills.
(ii) The training required under subdivision
(e)(2)(D)(i) of this section shall include instruction on recognizing and
refusing a driver's license under § 27-16-801(b)(2)(C) or an identification
card under § 27-16-805(e)(2) that is not valid for voter identification
purposes.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 5, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-5-113. Reporting of persons holding noncitizen driver's license or
identification card.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall prepare and deliver to the Secretary of State a monthly report listing
the names and identifying information of each person holding a driver's
license issued under § 27-16-801(a)(1)(C) or an identification card under §
27-16-805(b)(1)(D).
(b)(1)(A) Upon receipt of the report prepared under subsection (a) of
this section, the Secretary of State shall verify if any person listed in the
report is listed in the voter registration record files maintained by the
Secretary of State.
(B) The Secretary of State may use any database available
to the office of the Secretary of State to assist in the verification of the
citizenship of a person listed in the report prepared under subdivision (a)
of this section.
(2) If a person listed in the report prepared under subsection
03-10-2025 11:19:45 ZRC051

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1422
(a) of this section is found to be registered as a voter in the Secretary of
State's voter registration record files:
(A) The Secretary of State shall notify the county clerk
of the county in which the person is registered to vote of the identity of
the person;
(B) A county clerk who receives notification under
subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall cancel the registration to vote
of the person identified under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section; and
(C) The Secretary of State shall refer to the Attorney
General for prosecution the person who was found to be registered as a voter
in the Secretary of State's voter registration files under subdivision (b)(2)
of this section.
(c)(1) The Secretary of State shall provide written notice to a person
who has had his or her registration to vote canceled under subdivision (b)(2)
of this section that the Secretary of State found that the person was not a
citizen of the United States, that the person possessed a driver's license
issued under § 27-16-801(a)(1)(C) or an identification card issued under §
27-16-805(b)(1)(D), that the person was referred to the Attorney General for
prosecution, and that the person's registration to vote was canceled.
(2) The written notice provided under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall inform the person that if he or she wishes to contest the
findings of the Secretary of State under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
he or she may provide evidence or documentary proof of United States
citizenship to the Secretary of State.
(d) The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules to implement this
section, including without limitation rules to contest a finding under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 27-16-801(a)(1), concerning the types of
licenses that may be issued by the Office of Driver Services, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) A license issued to a person who is not a citizen of
the United States shall expire no later than:
(i) The expiration date of the documentary evidence
of person's lawful status in the United States provided under § 27-16-
1105(a)(1)(D)(ii)—(xi); or
03-10-2025 11:19:45 ZRC051

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1422
(ii) The period provided for under § 27-16-1111.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 27-16-801(b)(1), concerning the contents
required to be contained on the face of a driver's license, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) A license issued under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this
section shall clearly display on its face the phrase "Limited Term" or
"Limited-Term".

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 27-16-801(b)(2)(C), concerning the purposes
for which a driver's license is valid, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) A license issued under subdivision (a)(1)(C) or
subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section is not valid for:
(a) Federal identification purposes; or
(b) Voter identification purposes.
(ii) The license issued under subdivision (a)(1)(C)
or subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section shall clearly display on its face
the phrase “Not valid for federal identification purposes or voter
identification purposes”.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 27-16-801(e), concerning the administrative
requirements for the issuance of a driver's license, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6) A license issued under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section
shall be:
(A) Distinctive in appearance from the regular driver's
license issued to a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older; and
(B) Printed in a vertical or portrait format.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 27-16-805(b), concerning the issuance of
identification cards, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(3) If the applicant is not a citizen of the United States and
provided evidence of his or her lawful status in the United States under §
27-16-1105(a)(1)(D)(ii)—(xi), the identification card shall expire no later
than:
03-10-2025 11:19:45 ZRC051

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1422
(A) The expiration date of the documentary evidence of
person's lawful status in the United States provided under § 27-16-
1105(a)(1)(D)(ii)—(xi); or
(B) The period provided for under § 27-16-1112.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 27-16-805(c), concerning the issuance of
identification cards, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, each
identification card shall contain:
(1)(A) A color photograph of the applicant;
(2)(B) A physical description of the applicant;
(3)(C) The birthdate of the applicant;
(4)(D) The address of the applicant;
(5)(E) The date of issue; and
(6)(F) The expiration date.
(2) If the applicant is not a citizen of the United States and
has provided evidence of his or her lawful status in the United States under
§ 27-16-1105(a)(1)(D)(ii)—(xi), the identification card shall:
(A) Be distinctive in appearance from an identification
card issued to a citizen of the United States;
(B) Clearly display on its face the phrase "Limited Term"
or "Limited-Term"; and
(C) Be printed in a vertical or portrait format.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 27-16-805(e)(2), concerning the issuance
of identification cards is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) An identification card issued under subdivision (b)(1)(C)
or subdivision (e)(1) of this section is not valid for:
(i) Federal identification purposes; or
(ii) Voter identification purposes.
(B) The identification card issued under subdivision
(b)(1)(C) or subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall clearly display on its
face the phrase “Not valid for federal identification purposes or voter
identification purposes”.

SECTION 13. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-12 of this act are effective
03-10-2025 11:19:45 ZRC051

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1422
on and after January 1, 2026.

/s/Long

































03-10-2025 11:19:45 ZRC051